District of Columbia statutes.
46-359.01

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 901, 63 DCR 222